District of Columbia statutes.
16-4209

Participation in mediation.

(a)

An attorney or other individual designated by a mediation party may accompany the party to and participate in a mediation.

(b)

A waiver of participation given before the mediation may be rescinded.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 10 of the Uniform Mediation Act.